Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 8 Creation by Deed to Acquire Beneficial Interest

Cross references.

Fiduciary powers of financial institutions, §

7-1-310

.

Time limitation on bringing of actions against trustees, §

9-3-27

.

Petitions for declaratory judgments involving action or abstention from action by trustees, §

9-4-4

.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 40 Mercer L. Rev. 471 (1988).

53-12-150.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Deed” means and includes any written agreement, declaration of trust, or other instrument which creates a trust estate in the trustee named therein and sets forth the terms and conditions of the trust and which indicates an intention, either expressly or by implication, that the trust estate created therein should be subject to this chapter, but such term shall not include a warranty deed, quitclaim deed, bill of sale, or other instrument that conveys title to property to a trustee merely by virtue of such fact alone.

“Property” includes improved or unimproved property, real or personal, leaseholds, mortgages, notes, other obligations secured by property or any interest therein, or other interests in such property.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-151.
Deeds to interests in property.

The owners of property located in this state or persons desiring to acquire beneficial ownership of such property may create by deed an estate therein and in the improvements made thereon and in the property to be acquired, for the benefit of themselves and such other persons, whether sui juris or not, who may contribute to the improvement or development or acquisition of the property and their assigns or transferees, provided that the deed creating the estate shall provide for the improvement or development of the property covered thereby or for the acquisition of the property and the trustee therein named, and his or her successor shall have some active duty to perform in and about the trust property or the management or control of the same. The deed creating the estate shall be recorded as provided in Code Section 53-12-152. When such an estate is created, the legal title to the property and all the property added thereto or substituted therefor shall vest and remain in the trustee named and his or her successor, in accordance with the terms of the deed, with all the powers conferred thereby upon the trustee, and shall not during the continuance of the estate pass to or vest in the beneficiaries. At the end of 25 years from the date of the deed creating the estate, the title to such of the property as may then belong to the estate shall vest in the beneficiaries; and, if the deed creating the estate so provides, a renewal of the estate may be made at the end of the 25 years, upon the terms and conditions and in the manner therein set forth, for a like period; provided, however, that in the alternative to the period of 25 years and the renewal thereof, if the deed so provides, the estate may be created for any period of time specified therein which does not extend beyond any number of lives in being and 21 years thereafter.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-152.
Filing of deeds and amendments thereto; filing of copies with Secretary of State.

The deed creating a trust estate as provided in Code Section 53-12-151 shall, within 30 days of the execution thereof, be filed by the trustee in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the principal office of the trust is located. The trustee shall concurrently pay to the clerk the fee prescribed in Code Section 15-6-77. Upon the deed being filed with the clerk and the fees being paid, the clerk shall deliver to the trustee or his or her attorney two certified copies of the deed, the filing of the clerk thereon, and a receipt for the costs which have been paid to the clerk.

Upon receiving the two certified copies of the deed, the trustee or his or her attorney shall present the same to the Secretary of State and shall pay $5.00 to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall thereupon attach to one of the certified copies of the deed a certificate in substantially the following form:

STATE OF GEORGIA

OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE

Click to view

The certified copy of the deed, together with the certificate of the Secretary of State thereon, shall be received as evidence in any court or proceeding as evidence of the existence of the trust and of its nature, terms, and conditions.

The Secretary of State, at any time, upon the request of any person, shall make and certify additional copies of the deed, filing of the clerk, and certificate of the Secretary of State, upon payment to him or her of a fee of $1.00, plus 10¢ per 100 words for copying, and the additional certified copies shall be likewise admitted in evidence with like force and effect.

Any amendment of a deed shall be filed with the clerk of the superior court and the Secretary of State in the same manner and under the same conditions required in the filing of the original deed, and the fees payable upon the filing shall be computed as if the filing were of an original deed.

This is to certify that a copy of the attached certified copy of a deed, declaration, or agreement of trust dated , by and between as settlor(s) and as trustee(s), which states that the trustee(s) may use the name of , has been duly filed in the office of the Secretary of State and the fees paid therefor, as provided by law. WITNESS my hand and official seal this day of , . Secretary of State

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-153.
Name of trust.

If the deed creating a trust estate under Code Section 53-12-151 so provides, the trustee may conduct and transact the affairs of the trust estate under a business or trade name, which name shall be set forth in the deed. The name may include the word “trust” but shall not include the words “trust company.”

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 62 Mercer L. Rev. 365 (2010).

53-12-154.
Certificates of beneficial interest by trustees.

When an estate is created pursuant to Code Section 53-12-151 and from time to time thereafter, the trustee shall issue such certificates of beneficial interest as may be provided for by the deed to the persons who are beneficially interested in the estate or who become so interested therein in accordance with the provisions of the deed. The certificates shall pass and be transferred as personalty and in the same manner as shares of stock in corporations and shall be subject to levy and sale under attachment or execution or any other process in like manner as shares of stock. The trustee or person in charge of the estate representing the trustee shall be subject to the same demand as that provided by Code Sections 9-13-58 and 11-8-112 for the levying officer to make upon the officers of a corporation. Persons having claims against the estate may enforce the same by action against the trustee thereof in like manner as actions against corporations, and service thereof may be perfected by serving the trustee, if a resident of this state, and if not, then by publication. The venue of such actions shall be the same as that of similar actions against private corporations, but neither the trustee nor the beneficiaries of the estate shall be personally or individually liable therefor except in cases where officers and stockholders of private corporations would be liable under the law.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-155.
Duties and powers of trustees;
resignation or removal; successor trustees.

The trustee of a trust created under Code Section 53-12-151 shall have sole and exclusive management and control of the property, in accordance with the terms of the deed creating the estate. The exercise by the trustee of any power granted or conferred by the deed, including the power to lease, encumber, and sell, when exercised in accordance with the terms thereof, shall be as valid and effective to all intents and purposes as if the trustee was the sole and exclusive owner of the property in his or her own right. The trustee may resign or be removed and his or her successor may be appointed in the manner of and in accordance with the terms fixed by the deed creating the estate. The same rights, powers, and title over and to the property shall belong to and be vested in the new trustee as are conferred upon the original trustee by the deed creating the estate. The death of a trustee shall not operate to cast title upon his or her heirs, devisees, executors, or administrators, but the same shall vest in his or her successor, when appointed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-156.
Investments by trustees.

In addition to investments in any property, the trustee of a trust created under Code Section 53-12-151 may invest any funds of the trust estate in investments authorized by trustees under the laws of this state; provided, however, that the deed creating the estate may further limit or expand the powers and authority of the trustee with respect to investments, including the power to invest in property located outside this state. The trustee shall be authorized and empowered, in accordance with the terms of the deed creating the estate, from corpus or from income or from both, to repurchase or redeem any issued and outstanding certificates of beneficial interest.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-156

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-157.
Initial and annual returns.

Each trust created pursuant to this article shall make a return to the Secretary of State, upon the creation of the trust and annually thereafter, in the same manner and embracing the same information, insofar as applicable, as returns by corporations which are required to be made under Articles 1 and 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 14, including the provisions with regard to fees, penalty for noncompliance, and recording and certifying of copies of the returns.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-157

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-158.
How title vests on termination of estate.

Upon the termination of the estate created under Code Section 53-12-151, the legal title to all the property belonging to the estate which is then undisposed of shall pass to and vest in the persons who are, at that time, the beneficiaries of the estate, in shares corresponding to their respective interest as beneficiaries.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-158

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.

53-12-159.
Merger of trust into a domestic corporation.

Any trust created pursuant to this article may be merged into a domestic corporation for profit organized under the laws of this state and subject to Title 14 if the deed creating the trust expressly authorizes the merger.

With respect to the required procedure for the merger and the rights of dissenting shareholders:

The trust shall comply with any applicable provisions of the deed creating the trust and with the following Code sections, as if the trust were a domestic corporation:

Subsection (b) of Code Section 14-2-1103, as if the trustee of the trust were a board of directors of a domestic corporation;

Subsections (c) through (i) of Code Section 14-2-1103 and Code Sections 14-2-1301 through 14-2-1332, as if the holders of certificates of beneficial interest in the trust were shareholders of a domestic corporation; and

Code Sections 14-2-1105 and 14-2-1105.1; and

The domestic corporation into which the trust is merged shall comply with the provisions of Title 14, relating to the merger of domestic corporations, in the same manner as if the trust being merged into it were a domestic corporation.

Upon compliance with the requirements of this Code section and the filing of articles of merger providing for a merger of the trust into a domestic corporation in the manner provided in Code Sections 14-2-1105 and 14-2-1105.1, the Secretary of State shall treat the merger as if it were a merger of corporations under Code Sections 14-2-1105 and 14-2-1105.1.

If the Secretary of State issues a certificate of merger, the merger shall become effective as of the time of delivery to the Secretary of State of the articles of merger so certified, as provided in Code Section 14-2-1105, or at such later time and date as the articles specify, not to exceed 60 days from the date of delivery of the articles to the Secretary of State. When the merger has become effective:

The trust and the domestic corporation into which the trust is merged shall be a single domestic corporation;

The separate existence of the trust shall cease;

The domestic corporation shall continue to have all the rights, privileges, immunities, and powers and shall be subject to all the duties and liabilities of a corporation organized under Title 14;

The domestic corporation shall possess all the rights, privileges, immunities, and franchises, of a public as well as of a private nature, of the trust; and all property, real, personal, and mixed, all debts due on whatever account, including subscriptions to shares, all other choses in action, and all and every other interest of or belonging to or due to the trust shall be taken and deemed to be transferred to and vested in the domestic corporation without further act or deed; and the title to any real property or any interest therein vested in the trust shall not revert or be in any way impaired by reason of the merger;

The domestic corporation shall be responsible and liable for all the liabilities and obligations of the trust. Any claim existing or action or proceeding pending by or against the trust may be prosecuted as if the merger had not taken place, or the domestic corporation may be substituted in its place. Neither the rights of creditors nor any liens upon the property of the trust shall be impaired by the merger; and

The articles of incorporation of the domestic corporation shall be deemed to be amended to the extent, if any, that changes in its articles of incorporation are stated in the plan of merger.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-12-159

, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 579, § 1/SB 131.